Massachusetts, session 194th, H4239.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) The terms used in this section shall have the following meanings unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Amnesty period”, a period of time commencing for 2 consecutive months and not earlier
than the date a local legislative body establishes a municipal tax amnesty program according to
this act and expiring not later than June 30, 2027, as the local legislative body might determine,
during which the municipal tax amnesty program established by the local legislative body shall
be in effect in that city or town.
“Collector”, a person receiving a tax list and a warrant to collect the same.
“Covered amount”, the aggregate of all penalties, fees, charges and accrued interest
assessed by the collector or treasurer for the failure of a certain taxpayer to timely pay a subject
liability; provided, however, that the covered amount shall not include the subject liability itself
or any fees and charges authorized or incurred for the collection of a past due subject liability for
of 2

which notice has been issued; and provided further, that nothing in this section shall authorize
the waiver of penalties, fees, charges and accrued interest resulting from the violation of any law,
municipal by-law or ordinance.
“Municipal tax amnesty program”, a temporary policy by a city or town to forever waive
its right to collect all or any uniform proportion of the covered amount, as determined by the
local legislative body, then due from any person who, prior to the expiration of the amnesty
period, voluntarily pays the collector or treasurer the full amount of the subject liability that
serves as the basis for the covered amount; provided, however, that a municipal tax amnesty
program shall not include a policy that enables or requires a city or town to waive its right to
collect the covered amount from a person who, at the time of commencement of the amnesty
period is or was the subject of a criminal investigation or prosecution for failure to pay the city or
town any subject liability or covered amount.
“Subject liability”, the principal amount of a particular tax or excise liability payable by a
taxpayer under chapter 59, 60, 60A or 60B of the General Laws, as determined by the local
legislative body.
“Treasurer”, as described in chapter 41 of the General Laws.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the local legislative body
in any city or town may vote to establish a municipal tax amnesty program according to the
provisions of this section and shall, at the same time as such vote, determine the amnesty period.
Tax amnesty periods shall not extend beyond June 30, 2027. The commissioner of revenue may
issue such guidelines as he deems appropriate to carry out this section.
SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2